Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1816
Inquest; body of deceased; disposition.

The coroner shall cause the body of each deceased person which the coroner is caused to view, to be delivered to the friends of the deceased, if there be any, but if there be none, the coroner shall cause the body to be decently buried and the expenses shall be paid from any property belonging to the deceased, or if there be none, from the county treasury, by warrant drawn thereon.

Laws 1879, § 111, p. 384;

R.S.1913, § 5678;

C.S.1922, § 5008;

C.S.1929, § 26-1517;

R.S.1943, § 23-1816;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 78.

An undertaker who inters a dead body at request of coroner will be allowed compensation therefor, though inquest was unnecessary. Darling v. Box Butte County, 78 Neb. 564, 111 N.W. 470 (1907).